Missouri, session 2026, HB3292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 217 and 557, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 217.1250 and 557.530, to read as follows:
217.1250. 1. The department of corrections shall establish a boot camp
incarceration program for persons sentenced under section 557.530, to be known as the
"Motivational Boot Camp Incarceration Program".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of corrections;
(2) "Eligible inmate", a person seventeen years of age or older and younger than
twenty-two years of age who is sentenced to the program as provided under section
557.530;
(3) "Motivational boot camp", an incarceration program in which eligible
inmates participate for a period of two years in a humane program that provides for
rigorous physical activity and intensive regimentation and discipline;
(4) "Program", the motivational boot camp incarceration program established
under this section.
3. The program shall include:
(1) As a major component, a strong emphasis on work, physical activity, physical
conditioning, and good health practices;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 3292 & 2171 2
(2) A strong emphasis on intensive counseling and treatment programming
designed to correct criminal and other maladaptive thought processes and behavior
patterns and to instill self-discipline and self-motivation;
(3) A detailed, clearly written explanation of program goals, objectives, rules,
and criteria that shall be provided to, read by, and signed by all enrollees; and
(4) An enrollment period of two years.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
5. The department of corrections shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the implementation and administration of the program. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
557.530. 1. Any person who is seventeen years of age or older and under twenty-
two years of age and who has had two prior convictions for nonviolent criminal offenses
may upon a third conviction involving a nonviolent criminal offense that is not a class A
or class B felony be sentenced to the motivational boot camp incarceration program
established under section 217.1250 in lieu of a jail or prison sentence.
2. A person sentenced to the motivational boot camp incarceration program
under subsection 1 of this section shall be enrolled in the motivational boot camp
incarceration program for a period of two years. The time shall begin upon the initial
confinement in the program.
3. Before a court may place a person in the motivational boot camp
incarceration program, an initial investigation shall be completed by an officer
indicating that the:
(1) Person is qualified for placement in the motivational boot camp
incarceration program and the person does not appear to be physically or mentally

HCS HBs 3292 & 2171 3
disabled in a way that would prevent the person from performing strenuous physical
activity;
(2) Person is not under seventeen years of age and is not twenty-two years of age
or older at the time of sentencing; and
(3) Department of corrections has granted provisional approval of the placement
of the person in the motivational boot camp incarceration program.
4. A person exhibiting obvious signs of a contagious disease shall not be placed in
a motivational boot camp incarceration program until he or she has been cleared by a
medical professional for participation in a program.
5. The court shall direct the department of corrections to arrange with the
sheriff's department in the county of incarceration to have the person delivered to the
boot camp on a specific date that is not more than fifteen days after the issuance of the
order for placement in the motivational boot camp incarceration program.
6. At any time during the person's confinement in the motivational boot camp
incarceration program, but at least five days prior to the person's expected date of
release, the department of corrections shall certify to the court as to whether the person
has satisfactorily completed the motivational boot camp incarceration program.
7. Upon receipt of a satisfactory report of performance in the motivational boot
camp incarceration program from the department of corrections, the court shall release
the person from confinement, and, notwithstanding any provision of law, the offense for
which the person was sentenced to the boot camp may be expunged from the person's
criminal record.
8. Receipt of an unsatisfactory report shall be grounds for the court to impose
the remainder of the jail or prison sentence for the offense of which the person was
convicted.
9. If the person convicted indicates that he or she does not want to be sentenced
to the motivational boot camp incarceration program or the person is not eligible to be
sentenced to the motivational boot camp incarceration program, the court shall sentence
the person to jail or prison time as provided by law.
10. As used in this section, "nonviolent criminal offense" means any offense that
is not murder in the first or second degree, involuntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter in the first or second degree, kidnapping, kidnapping in the first degree,
rape in the first degree, forcible rape, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy,
robbery in the first degree, or assault in the first degree.
✔